src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Sakirabiá language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
et+V:et TAM_ "sleep"   ;
i'at+V:i'a%{tr%} TAM_ "catch something/pegar algo" ;
ko+V:ko TAM_ "injest: eat, drink, smoke, copulate" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
